Illinois, session 104th, SB1699.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Noncitizen Population Spending Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Reporting requirements.7    (a) The Department of Human Services, in collaboration 8with relevant State agencies, shall prepare an annual report 9identifying all State spending on services and resources for 10noncitizen and asylum-seeking populations, including, but not 11limited to, services and resources provided by the following 12State entities:13        (1) the State Board of Education;14        (2) the Department of Human Services;15            (A) the Bureau of Refugee and Immigrant Services;16            (B) the Office of Hispanic/Latino Affairs;17            (C) the Illinois Welcoming Center;18            (D) the Chief Homelessness Officer; and19            (E) programs providing support to victims of 20        trafficking, torture, and other serious crimes.21        (3) the Department of Public Health, including the 22    State Refugee Health Coordinator;23        (4) the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and   SB1699- 2 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1    Office of Homeland Security;2        (5) the Department of Central Management Services;3        (6) the Department of Labor; and4        (7) the Department of Healthcare and Family Services.5    (b) The report shall include the following information 6concerning the expenditures identified in subsection (a):7        (1) the total amount spent on noncitizen and 8    asylum-seeking populations in the previous fiscal year;9        (2) the specific appropriation authorizing the 10    spending;11        (3) any transfers among line-item appropriations 12    associated with noncitizen and asylum-seeking populations13        (4) the total number of families or individuals 14    impacted by each service or resource;15        (5) the funding sources of the service or resource; 16    and17        (6) contracts awarded to organizations providing 18    noncitizen and asylum-seeking populations access to 19    services or resources in, at a minimum, the following 20    categories:21            (A) emergency shelter and housing;22            (B) food;23            (C) health screenings;24            (D) medical assessments and treatments;25            (E) case management services to assist critical 26        needs, including legal services and job readiness   SB1699- 3 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1        support;2            (F) enrollment in public schools;3            (G) long-term housing and housing assistance;4            (H) injury and wound care, vaccinations, and 5        chronic health condition management;6            (I) mental health assessments; and7            (J) any other spending related to noncitizen or 8        asylum-seeking populations. 9    Section 10. Submission of the report. On or before 10November 15, 2025, and each year thereafter, the Department of 11Human Services shall submit the report described in Section 5 12to the General Assembly. 13    Section 15. Publication and accessibility. The Department 14of Human Services shall post and maintain the report described 15in Section 5 on its publicly available website. 16    Section 20. Coordination with State agencies. The 17Department of Human Services is authorized to coordinate 18efforts under this Act with other State agencies to prepare 19and submit a cohesive report for the General Assembly. 20    Section 90. The State Budget Law of the Civil 21Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 2250-5 as follows:   SB1699- 4 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1    (15 ILCS 20/50-5)2    Sec. 50-5. Governor to submit State budget. 3    (a) The Governor shall, as soon as possible and not later 4than the second Wednesday in March in 2010 (March 10, 2010), 5the third Wednesday in February in 2011, the fourth Wednesday 6in February in 2012 (February 22, 2012), the first Wednesday 7in March in 2013 (March 6, 2013), the fourth Wednesday in March 8in 2014 (March 26, 2014), the first Wednesday in February in 92022 (February 2, 2022), and the third Wednesday in February 10of each year thereafter, except as otherwise provided in this 11Section, submit a State budget, embracing therein the amounts 12recommended by the Governor to be appropriated to the 13respective departments, offices, and institutions, and for all 14other public purposes, the estimated revenues from taxation, 15and the estimated revenues from sources other than taxation. 16Except with respect to the capital development provisions of 17the State budget, beginning with the revenue estimates 18prepared for fiscal year 2012, revenue estimates shall be 19based solely on: (i) revenue sources (including non-income 20resources), rates, and levels that exist as of the date of the 21submission of the State budget for the fiscal year and (ii) 22revenue sources (including non-income resources), rates, and 23levels that have been passed by the General Assembly as of the 24date of the submission of the State budget for the fiscal year 25and that are authorized to take effect in that fiscal year.   SB1699- 5 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1Except with respect to the capital development provisions of 2the State budget, the Governor shall determine available 3revenue, deduct the cost of essential government services, 4including, but not limited to, pension payments and debt 5service, and assign a percentage of the remaining revenue to 6each statewide prioritized goal, as established in Section 750-25 of this Law, taking into consideration the proposed 8goals set forth in the report of the Commission established 9under that Section. The Governor shall also demonstrate how 10spending priorities for the fiscal year fulfill those 11statewide goals. The amounts recommended by the Governor for 12appropriation to the respective departments, offices and 13institutions shall be formulated according to each 14department's, office's, and institution's ability to 15effectively deliver services that meet the established 16statewide goals. The amounts relating to particular functions 17and activities shall be further formulated in accordance with 18the object classification specified in Section 13 of the State 19Finance Act. In addition, the amounts recommended by the 20Governor for appropriation shall take into account each State 21agency's effectiveness in achieving its prioritized goals for 22the previous fiscal year, as set forth in Section 50-25 of this 23Law, giving priority to agencies and programs that have 24demonstrated a focus on the prevention of waste and the 25maximum yield from resources. 26    Beginning in fiscal year 2011, the Governor shall   SB1699- 6 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1distribute written quarterly financial reports on operating 2funds, which may include general, State, or federal funds and 3may include funds related to agencies that have significant 4impacts on State operations, and budget statements on all 5appropriated funds to the General Assembly and the State 6Comptroller. The reports shall be submitted no later than 45 7days after the last day of each quarter of the fiscal year and 8shall be posted on the Governor's Office of Management and 9Budget's website on the same day. The reports shall be 10prepared and presented for each State agency and on a 11statewide level in an executive summary format that may 12include, for the fiscal year to date, individual itemizations 13for each significant revenue type as well as itemizations of 14expenditures and obligations, by agency, with an appropriate 15level of detail. The reports shall include a calculation of 16the actual total budget surplus or deficit for the fiscal year 17to date. The Governor shall also present periodic budget 18addresses throughout the fiscal year at the invitation of the 19General Assembly. 20    The Governor shall not propose expenditures and the 21General Assembly shall not enact appropriations that exceed 22the resources estimated to be available, as provided in this 23Section. Appropriations may be adjusted during the fiscal year 24by means of one or more supplemental appropriation bills if 25any State agency either fails to meet or exceeds the goals set 26forth in Section 50-25 of this Law.   SB1699- 7 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1    For the purposes of Article VIII, Section 2 of the 1970 2Illinois Constitution, the State budget for the following 3funds shall be prepared on the basis of revenue and 4expenditure measurement concepts that are in concert with 5generally accepted accounting principles for governments:6        (1) General Revenue Fund.7        (2) Common School Fund.8        (3) Educational Assistance Fund.9        (4) Road Fund.10        (5) Motor Fuel Tax Fund.11        (6) Agricultural Premium Fund.12    These funds shall be known as the "budgeted funds". The 13revenue estimates used in the State budget for the budgeted 14funds shall include the estimated beginning fund balance, plus 15revenues estimated to be received during the budgeted year, 16plus the estimated receipts due the State as of June 30 of the 17budgeted year that are expected to be collected during the 18lapse period following the budgeted year, minus the receipts 19collected during the first 2 months of the budgeted year that 20became due to the State in the year before the budgeted year. 21Revenues shall also include estimated federal reimbursements 22associated with the recognition of Section 25 of the State 23Finance Act liabilities. For any budgeted fund for which 24current year revenues are anticipated to exceed expenditures, 25the surplus shall be considered to be a resource available for 26expenditure in the budgeted fiscal year.  SB1699- 8 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1    Expenditure estimates for the budgeted funds included in 2the State budget shall include the costs to be incurred by the 3State for the budgeted year, to be paid in the next fiscal 4year, excluding costs paid in the budgeted year which were 5carried over from the prior year, where the payment is 6authorized by Section 25 of the State Finance Act. For any 7budgeted fund for which expenditures are expected to exceed 8revenues in the current fiscal year, the deficit shall be 9considered as a use of funds in the budgeted fiscal year.10    Revenues and expenditures shall also include transfers 11between funds that are based on revenues received or costs 12incurred during the budget year.13    Appropriations for expenditures shall also include all 14anticipated statutory continuing appropriation obligations 15that are expected to be incurred during the budgeted fiscal 16year.17    By March 15 of each year, the Commission on Government 18Forecasting and Accountability shall prepare revenue and fund 19transfer estimates in accordance with the requirements of this 20Section and report those estimates to the General Assembly and 21the Governor. 22    For all funds other than the budgeted funds, the proposed 23expenditures shall not exceed funds estimated to be available 24for the fiscal year as shown in the budget. Appropriation for a 25fiscal year shall not exceed funds estimated by the General 26Assembly to be available during that year.  SB1699- 9 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1    (b) By February 24, 2010, the Governor must file a written 2report with the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the 3House of Representatives containing the following:4        (1) for fiscal year 2010, the revenues for all 5    budgeted funds, both actual to date and estimated for the 6    full fiscal year;7        (2) for fiscal year 2010, the expenditures for all 8    budgeted funds, both actual to date and estimated for the 9    full fiscal year;10        (3) for fiscal year 2011, the estimated revenues for 11    all budgeted funds, including without limitation the 12    affordable General Revenue Fund appropriations, for the 13    full fiscal year; and14        (4) for fiscal year 2011, an estimate of the 15    anticipated liabilities for all budgeted funds, including 16    without limitation the affordable General Revenue Fund 17    appropriations, debt service on bonds issued, and the 18    State's contributions to the pension systems, for the full 19    fiscal year. 20    Between July 1 and August 31 of each fiscal year, the 21members of the General Assembly and members of the public may 22make written budget recommendations to the Governor. 23    Beginning with budgets prepared for fiscal year 2013, the 24budgets submitted by the Governor and appropriations made by 25the General Assembly for all executive branch State agencies 26must adhere to a method of budgeting where each priority must   SB1699- 10 -LRB104 05830 SPS 15861 b1be justified each year according to merit rather than 2according to the amount appropriated for the preceding year. 3    Beginning with budgets prepared for fiscal year 2027, the 4budgets submitted by the Governor and appropriations made by 5the General Assembly for all executive branch State agencies 6must include a detailed accounting of all proposed spending on 7noncitizen and asylum-seeking populations.8(Source: P.A. 102-671, eff. 11-30-21.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.